Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1510.01
Board; powers; costs and fees.

After the Tax Equalization and Review Commission obtains exclusive jurisdiction of an appeal from a decision, order, determination, or action of a county board of equalization pursuant to section 77-5013, the board shall have no power or authority to compromise, settle, or otherwise change the decision, order, determination, or action it has taken. The board may, with approval of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission, offer to confess judgment for part of the value claimed or part of the causes involved in the action. If (1) the appellant is present and refuses to accept such confession of judgment in full of the appellant's demands against the board in such action or the appellant fails to attend having had reasonable notice that the offer would be made, its terms, and the time of making it and (2) at hearing the appellant does not obtain more relief than was offered to be confessed, the appellant shall pay all the costs and fees the board incurred after making the offer. The offer shall not be deemed to be an admission of the cause of action or relief to which the appellant is entitled, and the offer shall not be given in evidence at the hearing.

Laws 1989, LB 653, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 152;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 36.